src/Main/Hurrian.lexc
LEXICON Adverb
anam	Adv; ! so
anammi	Adv; ! so
ašḫu	Adv; ! oben
ḫenni	Adv; ! jetzt
kuro	Adv; ! wieder
šukko	Adv; ! einmal
tiššan	Adv; ! sehr
tūri	Adv; ! down
tūrī+e	Adv; ! downward
undo	Adv; ! jetzt
īā		Adv; ! why

LEXICON Adv
,Adv:0	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Conjunction
adi		Conj; ! so
adī		Conj; ! so
ai		Conj; ! wenn, falls
āi		Conj; ! wenn, falls
alaže	Conj; ! oder
inna	Conj; ! wenn, als
ia		Conj;
īa		Conj;
ie		Conj;
īe		Conj;
inu		Conj; ! wie
inū		Conj; ! wie
mā		Conj; ! so
panu	Conj; ! obgleich

LEXICON Conj
,Conj:0		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Numeral
šuga		Num; ! ein
šugi		Num; ! ein
šukka		Num; ! ein
šukki		Num; ! ein
šin			Num; ! zwei
šina		Num; ! zwei
kiga		Num; ! drei
kige		Num; ! drei
tumni		Num; ! vier
nari		Num; ! fünf
naria		Num; ! fünf
šeže		Num; ! sechs
šinda		Num; ! sieben
šindi		Num; ! sieben
kira		Num; ! acht
kiri		Num; ! acht
tamra		Num; ! neun
tamri		Num; ! neun
eman		Num; ! zehn
kig+eman	Num; ! dreizehn / dreizig
kir+eman	Num; ! achtzehn / achtzig
kir+man		Num; ! achtzehn / achtzig
nubi		Num; ! zehntausend
šin+zi		Num; ! zweite
kiški		Num; ! dritte
tumuš+ši	Num; ! vierte
tumun+zi	Num; ! vierte
nari+šše	Num; ! fünfte
šende+šše	Num; ! siebte
šindi+šše	Num; ! siebte
eman+zi		Num; ! zehnte
eman+ši		Num; ! zehnte
kir+eman+zi	Num; ! achtzehnte / achtzigste
kir+man+zi	Num; ! achtzehnte / achtzigste
šin+arbu	Num; ! zweijährig
kig+arbu	Num; ! dreijährig
tumn+arbu	Num; ! vierjährig
nari+arbu	Num; ! fünfjährig
šind+arbu	Num; ! siebenjährig
kir+arbu	Num; ! achtjährig
šug+am+ġ(e)+a	Num; ! einmal
šin+am+ġ(e)+a	Num; ! zweimal
eman+am+ġ(e)+a	Num; ! zehnmal
šin+ai			Num; ! zweimal
šin+ad(i)+ae	Num; ! jede zwei
šind+ai			Num; ! sechsmal

LEXICON Num
.NUM:0		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Pronoun
PersonalPronoun;
DeicticPronoun;
IndefiniteInterrogativePronoun;

LEXICON PersonalPronoun
1PRON.SG:išten		Absolutive;
1PRON.SG:ište(n)	Absolutive;
1PRON.SG:iž			LongErgative;
1PRON.SG:šo			GenDatEqu2;
1PRON.SG:šu			DirCom;
1PRON.SG:šū			DirCom;	
2PRON.SG:fe			AbsErgGenDatThemDir;
2PRON.SG:fē			AbsErgGenDatThemDir;
3PRON.SG:mānni		Absolutive;
3PRON.SG:manni		Absolutive;
3PRON.SG:mani		Absolutive;
3PRON.SG:manu		ErgAblComEqu2;
3PRON.SG:man		Essive;
1PRON.PL:šatti		Absolutive;
1PRON-PL:šatti-lla	Absolutive;
1PRON.PL:šie		Ergative;
1PRON-PL:ša-ž		GenDatThemDir;
2PRON-PL:fe-lla		Absolutive;
2PRON-PL:fe-ž		ThemErgGenDatEss;
3PRON-PL:mane-lla	Absolutive;
3PRON-PL:man-ž		ThemErgDatThemCom;
3PRON-PL:man-z		ThemErgDatThemCom;

LEXICON GenDatEqu2
Genitive;
Dative;
Equative2;

LEXICON DirCom
Directive;
Comitative;

LEXICON AbsErgGenDatThemDir
Absolutive;
Ergative;
Genitive;
Dative;
-EPNTH:-u	Directive;

LEXICON ErgAblComEqu2
Ergative;
Ablative;
Comitative;
Equative2;

LEXICON ThemErgGenDatEss
ThematicErgative;
Genitive;
Dative;
Essive;

LEXICON GenDatThemDir
Genitive;
Dative;
-EPNTH:-o	Directive;

LEXICON ThemErgDatThemCom
ThematicErgative;
Dative;
ThematicComitative;

LEXICON DeicticPronoun
anni	OptPlur; ! dieser
annu	Ablative; ! dieser
ani		Absolutive; ! dieser
anu		VarErgDatAbl; ! dieser
ane		DeicticPlural; ! dieser
ane		VarDeicticPlural;! dieser
andi	OptPlur; ! jener
andu	GenDat; ! jener
andū	DirectiveLocative; ! jener
akki	OptPlur; ! dieser
ākki	OptPlur; ! dieser
akku	ErgAbl; ! dieser
agi		Absolutive; ! jener
agu		DatDir; ! jener

LEXICON OptPlur
Absolutive;
DeicticPlural;

LEXICON DeicticPlural
-PL:-lla	Absolutive;

LEXICON VarDeicticPlural
.PL:+na		Absolutive;

LEXICON VarErgDatAbl
-ERG:-ēž	WordBoundary;
Dative;
Ablative;

LEXICON GenDat
Genitive;
Dative;

LEXICON ErgAbl
Ergative;
Ablative;

LEXICON DatDir
Dative;
Directive;

LEXICON IndefiniteInterrogativePronoun
ave		AbsErg;
abi		AbsErg;

LEXICON AbsErg
Absolutive;
Ergative;

LEXICON Noun
aStem;
āStem;
eStem;
ēStem;
iStem;
aiStem;
AthematicNoun;
ConsonantalNoun;

LEXICON aStem
ag		a; ! side
ēl		a; ! Schwester
men		a; ! Zwilling?; Geschwister?
ner		a; ! Mutter
šāl		a; ! Tochter
šēn		a; ! Bruder
tiš		a; ! Herz
keli	a;
pill	a; ! Kanal
šaušk	a;
šimig	a;
pa+ili	a; ! builder
tab+ili	a; ! Schmied
idenn	a; ! builder

LEXICON āStem
ag		ā; ! side
ež		ā; ! yonder

LEXICON eStem
āž		e; ! fat
eg		e; ! inner
ēž		e; ! Erde
ov		e; ! foolish
šī		e; ! Fluss
ard		e; ! Stadt
man		e;
taš		e; ! Geschenk
kiaš	e; ! Meer
pill	e; ! canal
ēpḫ		e; ! Ofen
šimīg	e;
att+ard	e; ! Vorfahr
paššītḫ	e; ! Gesandte
pašš+i+ġ	e;
pill	e; ! canal
pa+i+r	e; ! builder
šialī	e; ! stacked
ḫiar+o+ḫḫ	e; ! Gold
tāġ		e; ! Mann

LEXICON ēStem
ēpḫ		ē; ! oven
kar		ē; ! bird catcher
man		ē; ! DN
nešš	ē; ! donation
taġ		ē; ! Mann
tiv		ē; ! Wort
ḫalz	ē; ! district
kam		ē; ! (ein Tier)
na+i+ġ	ē; ! meadow
pill	ē; ! Kanal
serr	ē; ! donkey
tāl		ē; ! Holz
tal		ē; ! Holz

LEXICON aiStem
all		ai; ! Herrin
ušt		ai; ! Held

LEXICON AthematicNoun
amānu			AthemNoun; ! DN
ōlvī			AthemNoun; ! other
šēd+o+ilia		AthemNoun; ! flattened
šuɛ				AthemNoun;

LEXICON ConsonantalNoun
teššōb			CNoun; ! DN
tēššob			CNoun; ! DN

LEXICON a
a	NounThemVowel;
(a)	NounStem;

LEXICON ā
ā	NounThemVowel;
(ā)	NounStem;

LEXICON e
e	NounThemVowel;
(e)	NounStem;

LEXICON ē
ē	NounThemVowel;
(ē)	NounStem;

LEXICON i
i	NounThemVowel;
(i)	NounStem;

LEXICON ai
ai		NounThemVowel;
a(i)	NounStem;

LEXICON AthemNoun
NounThemVowel;
NounStem;

LEXICON CNoun
,Noun:0		PostCNoun;

LEXICON PostCNoun
Relator;
ConsonantalPossessive;
VocalicPossessive;
Plural;
Absolutive;
LongErgative;
ConsonantalOblique;
VocalicCase;

LEXICON NounThemVowel
,Noun:0		PostNounThemVowel;

LEXICON NounStem
,Noun:0		PostNounStem;

LEXICON PostNounThemVowel
Relator;
ConsonantalPossessive;
Plural;
Absolutive;
ConsonantalCase;

LEXICON PostNounStem
VocalicPossessive;
VocalicCase;

LEXICON Relator
-RELAT.SG:-nē			ConsonantalCase;
-RELAT.SG:-ne			ConsonantalCase;
-RELAT.SG:-n(e)			VocalicCase;
-RELAT.PL:-na			Absolutive;
-RELAT.PL:-n(a)			LongPlural;

LEXICON VocalicPossessive
-1POSS.SG:-iffe		Absolutive;
-1POSS.SG:-iffe		LongAblativeInstrumental;
-1POSS.SG:-iff(e)	VocalicCase;
<"-1POSS" ".SG" .x. "-" I {ff} U>	ConsonantalCase;
-3POSS.SG:-ī		Case;
-3POSS.SG:-i		Case;
-1POSS:-iff(e)		Plural;
-3POSS:-i			Plural;

LEXICON ConsonantalPossessive
-2POSS.SG:-b		Oblique;
-2POSS.SG:-v		ThematicErgative;
-2POSS.PL:-šši		Absolutive;
-2POSS.PL:-šu		Case;
-2POSS.PL:-ššu		Case;

LEXICON ConsonantalCase
Ergative;
ConsonantalOblique;

LEXICON ConsonantalOblique
Genitive;
Dative;
Directive;
Ablative;
Comitative;
Equative2;
Associative;
AblativeInstrumental;

LEXICON VocalicCase
Essive;
Instrumental;
Equative1;
DirectiveLocative;

LEXICON Oblique
ConsonantalOblique;
VocalicCase;

LEXICON Plural
-PL:-až		PluralCase;

LEXICON LongPlural
-PL:-āž		PluralCase;
Plural;

LEXICON PluralCase
Absolutive;
ThematicErgative;
Genitive;
Dative;
Directive;
Ablative;
ThematicComitative;
Essive;
ThematicEquative2;
ThematicLongAblativeInstrumental;

LEXICON ThematicErgative
-EPNTH:-o	Ergative;

LEXICON ThematicComitative
-EPNTH:-o	Comitative;

LEXICON ThematicEquative2
-EPNTH:-o	Equative2;

LEXICON ThematicLongAblativeInstrumental
-EPNTH:-a	LongAblativeInstrumental;

LEXICON Case
Absolutive;
NonAbsolutiveCase;

LEXICON NonAbsolutiveCase
ConsonantalCase;
VocalicCase;

! Case suffixes

LEXICON Absolutive
.ABS:0		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Ergative
-ERG:-ž		WordBoundary;

LEXICON LongErgative
-ERG:-až	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Genitive
-GEN:-vē	GenCont;
-GEN:-ve	GenCont;

LEXICON Dative
-DAT:-vā	WordBoundary;
-DAT:-va	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Directive
-DIR:-da	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Ablative
-ABL:-dan	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Comitative
-COM:-ra	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Essive
-ESS:-ā		WordBoundary;
-ESS:-a		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Instrumental
-INS:-ae	WordBoundary;
-INS:-āi	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Equative1
-EQU1:-ož		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Equative2
-EQU2:-nna		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Associative
-ASSOC:-nni		WordBoundary;

LEXICON AblativeInstrumental
LongAblativeInstrumental;
ShortAblativeInstrumental;

LEXICON LongAblativeInstrumental
-ABL/INS:-ne	WordBoundary;

LEXICON ShortAblativeInstrumental
-ABL/INS:-n		WordBoundary;

LEXICON DirectiveLocative
-DIR/LOC:-e		WordBoundary;

LEXICON iStem
el		i; ! Fest
ēn		i; ! Gott
en		i; ! Gott
id		i; ! Körper
ol		i; ! another
ōl		i; ! anderer
ārd		i; ! city
āšḫ		i; ! pelt
ašt		i; ! Frau
ērv		i; ! Hund
ēvr		i; ! Herr
fur		i; ! Blick
ḫan		i; ! Kind
kaz		i; ! Becher
kāz		i; ! cup
mad		i; ! wisdom
mād		i; ! wisdom
nāl		i; ! Rehbock
paḫ		i; ! Kopf
tār		i; ! Feuer
šān		i;
šīn		i; ! Auge
šug		i; ! Dach
šūg		i; ! Dach
alal	i; ! Gewand
ābr		i;
ēl+g	i; ! decoration
ōmīn	i; ! Land
kāmm	i; ! (ein Tier)
kebl	i; ! Jäger
keld	i; ! keldi-Opfer
kum+d	i; ! Turm
šīrn	i; ! gloss?
šō+n	i; ! hand
šuḫn	i; ! Mauer
tabl	i; ! Schmied
tupp	i; ! Tafel
atta+	i; ! Vater
al+ipš+	i; ! brick
attan	i; ! Vater
ēn		i; ! Gott
er+ān	i; ! tax
evr+n	i; ! Sache
īštan	i; ! inside
ištan	i; ! inside
išuḫn	i; ! Silber
ōmmin	i; ! Land
fūt+k	i; ! son
ḫēlōv	i; ! glory
ḫelōv	i; ! glory
kabal	i; ! copper
kābal	i; ! copper
mūž+un+	i;
nau+n	i; ! pasture
niġār	i; ! Mitgift
purul	i; ! Tempel
šaval	i; ! Jahr
šažar	i; ! saw
tōrov	i; ! Feind
muž+un+	i;
muž+ūn+	i;
ḫavorn	i; ! Himmel
ḫāvorn	i; ! Himmel
ḫazian	i; ! mayor;
ḫāž+ar	i; ! Öl
kebē+l	i; ! Jäger
kēbe+l	i; ! Jäger
magann	i; ! Geschenk
magānn	i; ! Geschenk
paba+n	i; ! Berg
pabā+n	i; ! Berg
pāba+n	i; ! Berg
ag+ūr+n	i; ! engraving
eā+šarr	i;
ḫēr+ār+	i; ! upper arm
ḫer+ār+	i; ! upper arm
paba+nn	i; ! Berg
pāba+nn	i; ! Berg
tab+i+r	i; ! smith
tīp+šār	i; ! matter
tip+šār	i; ! matter
taloġl	i; ! domestico
tapšāġ	i; ! cupbearer
fand+a+n	i; ! right
kir+ar+n	i;
šid+ar+n	i; ! Fluch
šid+ār+n	i; ! Fluch
taržuvā+n	i; ! human
fūt+k		i; ! son
ḫalz+ō+ġ+l	i; ! Bürgermeister
tab+rē+nn	i; ! Schmied
tupšarr		i; ! scribe
šukk+a+n	i; ! einzeln
faġr+o+n	i; ! gut
